Maine, session 132, LD264.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §681, sub-§5, as enacted by PL 2005, c. 647, §3 and affected by
§5, is amended to read:
5. Qualifying shareholder. "Qualifying shareholder" means a person who is a:
A. Shareholder in a cooperative housing corporation that owns a homestead in this
State; and
B. Shareholder for the preceding 12 months in the cooperative housing corporation
specified in paragraph A; and
C. Permanent resident of this State.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §683, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2017, c. 478, §1, is further
amended to read:
1. Exemption amount. Except for assessments for special benefits, the just value of
$10,000 of the homestead of a permanent resident of this State who has owned a homestead
in this State for the preceding 12 months is exempt from taxation. Notwithstanding this
subsection, a permanent resident of this State who loses ownership of a homestead in this
State due to a tax lien foreclosure and subsequently regains ownership of the homestead
from the municipality that foreclosed on the tax lien is deemed to have continuously owned
the homestead and may not be determined ineligible for the exemption provided in this
section due to the ownership of the homestead by the municipality. In determining the
local assessed value of the exemption, the assessor shall multiply the amount of the
exemption by the ratio of current just value upon which the assessment is based as furnished
in the assessor's annual return pursuant to section 383. If the title to the homestead is held
by the applicant jointly or in common with others, the exemption may not exceed $10,000
of the just value of the homestead, but may be apportioned among the owners who reside
on the property to the extent of their respective interests. A municipality responsible for
administering the homestead exemption has no obligation to create separate accounts for
each partial interest in a homestead owned jointly or in common.